liblouis/share/liblouis/tables/_translation_zh-TW-g0.ctb
always \x62cd\x5b50 1234-2456-3-125-156-1
always \x62d4\x90fd 135-345-2-145-34-3
always \x62d7\x53e3 246-5-123-12356-4
always \x62d8\x6ce5 13-1256-3-1345-16-5
always \x62d9\x8457 1-25-2-1-34-5
always \x6307\x6458 1-156-4-1-2346-2
always \x6311\x5254 124-246-3-124-16-5
always \x6311\x5f04 124-246-4-1345-12346-5
always \x6311\x6230 124-246-4-1-1236-5
always \x6311\x64a5 124-246-4-135-126-3
always \x6311\x64d4 124-246-3-145-1236-5
always \x6311\x71c8 124-246-4-145-1356-3
always \x6311\x9017 124-246-4-145-12356-5
always \x6311\x91c1 124-246-4-15-1456-5
always \x632f\x81c2 1-136-5-135-16-5
always \x6383\x5e1a 15-146-5-1-12356-4
always \x6392\x6bd4 1234-2456-2-135-16-5
always \x6392\x884c 1234-2456-2-1235-1346-2
always \x6392\x9577 1234-2456-2-1-1346-4
always \x6399\x9322 1-1356-5-245-2345-2
always \x63a2\x5b50 124-1236-5-125-156-1
always \x63a5\x61c9 13-346-3-13456-5
always \x63a5\x7e2b 13-346-3-12345-1356-5
always \x63a8\x78e8 124-1246-3-134-126-5
always \x63a9\x6c92 2345-4-134-126-5
always \x63db\x884c 1235-12456-5-1235-1346-2
always \x63e3\x5ea6 12-2356-4-145-25-5
always \x63e9\x6cb9 123-2456-3-234-2
always \x63ed\x6aeb 13-346-2-1-34-3
always \x6416\x6643 246-2-1235-456-5
always \x642a\x585e 124-1346-2-15-2346-5
always \x645f\x9322 14-12356-3-245-2345-2
always \x6487\x5b50 1234-346-4-125-156-1
always \x6492\x4f46 15-345-3-145-1236-5
always \x6492\x5b0c 15-345-3-13-246-3
always \x6492\x5c3f 15-345-3-1345-246-5
always \x6492\x624b 15-345-3-24-12356-4
always \x6492\x817f 15-345-3-124-1246-4
always \x6492\x8b0a 15-345-3-1235-456-4
always \x6492\x8cf4 15-345-3-14-2456-5
always \x6492\x91ce 15-345-3-346-4
always \x6492\x958b 15-345-3-123-2456-3
always \x64ad\x6620 135-126-3-13456-5
always \x64ad\x97f3 135-126-3-1456-3
always \x64cd\x884c 245-146-3-15-13456-5
always \x64d4\x5b50 145-1236-5-125-156-1
always \x64f2\x9084 1-156-2-1235-12456-2
always \x6518\x5937 1245-1346-2-16-2
always \x6518\x596a 1245-1346-2-145-25-2
always \x6524\x5b50 124-1236-3-125-156-1
always \x6524\x9084 124-1236-3-1235-12456-2
always \x652a\x548c 13-246-4-1235-25-5
always \x6536\x85cf 24-12356-3-245-1346-2
always \x6539\x884c 13-2456-4-1235-1346-2
always \x653e\x5047 12345-1346-5-13-23456-5
always \x6548\x61c9 15-246-5-13456-5
always \x6551\x96e3 13-234-5-1345-1236-5
always \x6557\x8208 135-2456-5-15-13456-5
always \x6563\x5149 15-1236-4-13-456-3
always \x6563\x5175 15-1236-4-135-13456-3
always \x6563\x6587 15-1236-4-123456-2
always \x6563\x66f2 15-1236-4-245-1256-4
always \x6563\x6c99 15-1236-4-24-345-3
always \x6578\x4e00 24-34-4-16-3
always \x6578\x4e0d 24-34-4-135-34-5
always \x6578\x4e8c 24-34-4-156-5
always \x6578\x5178 24-34-4-145-2345-4
always \x6578\x6578 24-34-4-24-34-5
always \x6578\x843d 24-34-4-14-25-5
always \x6578\x8aaa 24-34-4-24-25-3
always \x6578\x9322 24-34-4-245-2345-2
always \x6587\x904e 123456-5-13-25-5
always \x6587\x98fe 123456-5-24-156-5
always \x6597\x91cf 145-12356-4-14-46-2
always \x6599\x4e2d 14-246-5-1-12346-5
always \x6599\x5b50 14-246-5-125-156-1
always \x65a7\x5b50 12345-34-4-125-156-1
always \x65c5\x9577 14-1256-4-1-1346-4
always \x65cb\x98a8 15-45-5-12345-1356-3
always \x65cf\x9577 125-34-2-1-1346-4
always \x65d7\x5b50 245-16-2-125-156-1
always \x65e5\x5b50 1245-156-5-125-156-1
always \x65e5\x6688 1245-156-5-256-5
always \x65e5\x6c92 1245-156-5-134-126-5
always \x6613\x50b3 16-5-1-12456-5
always \x661f\x5bbf 15-13456-3-15-234-5
always \x661f\x76f8 15-13456-3-15-46-5
always \x6625\x5047 12-123456-3-13-23456-5
always \x662d\x8457 1-146-3-1-34-5
always \x6641\x932f 12-146-2-245-25-5
always \x6643\x8166 1235-456-5-1345-146-4
always \x6643\x8569 1235-456-5-145-1346-5
always \x6687\x7d66 15-23456-2-13-16-4
always \x6691\x5047 24-34-4-13-23456-5
always \x6696\x548c 1345-12456-4-1235-25-1
always \x66b4\x9732 1234-34-5-14-34-5
always \x66f2\x5b50 245-1256-4-125-156-1
always \x66f2\x5c3a 245-1256-3-12-156-4
always \x66f2\x5ea6 245-1256-3-145-34-5
always \x66f2\x6298 245-1256-3-1-2346-2
always \x66f2\x66f2 245-1256-3-245-1256-3
always \x66f2\x6c83 245-1256-3-25-5
always \x66f2\x76f4 245-1256-3-1-156-2
always \x66f2\x7dda 245-1256-3-15-2345-5
always \x66f2\x89e3 245-1256-3-13-346-4
always \x66f2\x961c 245-1256-3-12345-34-5
always \x66f4\x4e8b 13-1356-3-24-156-5
always \x66f4\x52d5 13-1356-3-145-12346-5
always \x66f4\x540d 13-1356-3-134-13456-2
always \x66f4\x5f35 13-1356-3-1-1346-3
always \x66f4\x5f97 13-1356-5-145-356-4
always \x66f4\x63db 13-1356-3-1235-12456-5
always \x66f4\x6539 13-1356-3-13-2456-4
always \x66f4\x65b0 13-1356-3-15-1456-3
always \x66f4\x6613 13-1356-3-16-5
always \x66f4\x66ff 13-1356-3-124-16-5
always \x66f4\x6b63 13-1356-3-1-1356-5
always \x66f4\x751f 13-1356-3-24-1356-3
always \x66f4\x865f 13-1356-3-1235-146-5
always \x66f4\x8863 13-1356-3-16-3
always \x66f4\x8fed 13-1356-3-145-346-2
always \x66f8\x5377 24-34-3-13-45-5
always \x66f9\x53c3 245-146-2-24-136-3
always \x66fe\x53c3 125-1356-3-24-136-3
always \x66fe\x5b50 125-1356-3-125-156-4
always \x66fe\x5b6b 125-1356-3-15-123456-3
always \x66fe\x6c0f 125-1356-3-24-156-5
always \x66fe\x7956 125-1356-3-125-34-4
always \x66fe\x978f 125-1356-3-13-12346-4
always \x6703\x5152 1235-1246-4-156-3
always \x6703\x7a3d 13-1246-5-13-16-3
always \x6703\x8a08 123-2356-5-13-16-5
always \x6703\x9577 1235-1246-5-1-1346-4
always \x6708\x5b50 236-5-125-156-1
always \x6708\x6688 236-5-256-5
always \x6708\x7d2f 236-5-14-356-4
always \x6709\x5206 234-4-12345-136-5
always \x6709\x671d 234-4-1-146-3
always \x670d\x5e16 12345-34-2-124-346-3
always \x671d\x4e09 1-146-3-15-1236-3
always \x671d\x4e0d 1-146-3-135-34-5
always \x671d\x4ee4 1-146-3-14-13456-5
always \x671d\x5915 1-146-3-15-16-5
always \x671d\x66e6 1-146-3-15-16-3
always \x671d\x6703 1-146-3-1235-1246-5
always \x671d\x671d 1-146-3-1-146-3
always \x671d\x6c23 1-146-3-245-16-5
always \x671d\x767c 1-146-3-12345-345-3
always \x671d\x79e6 1-146-3-245-1456-2
always \x671d\x967d 1-146-3-46-2
always \x671d\x9732 1-146-3-14-34-5
always \x671f\x5e74 13-16-3-1345-2345-2
always \x671f\x6708 13-16-3-236-5
always \x671f\x670d 13-16-3-12345-34-2
always \x6728\x585e 134-34-5-15-2456-3
always \x672a\x4e86 1246-5-14-246-4
always \x672b\x4e86 134-126-5-14-246-4
always \x672c\x5206 135-136-4-12345-136-5
always \x672c\x5b50 135-136-4-125-156-1
always \x672c\x884c 135-136-4-1235-1346-2
always \x674e\x5b50 14-16-4-125-156-1
always \x6751\x5b50 245-123456-3-125-156-1
always \x6751\x9577 245-123456-3-1-1346-4
always \x676f\x5b50 135-356-3-125-156-1
always \x677e\x6fe4 15-12346-3-124-146-3
always \x679c\x5b50 13-25-4-125-156-1
always \x67af\x840e 123-34-3-1246-3
always \x67b6\x5b50 13-23456-5-125-156-1
always \x67da\x5b50 234-5-125-156-1
always \x67e5\x52d8 12-345-2-123-1236-5
always \x67f1\x5b50 1-34-5-125-156-1
always \x67fa\x5b50 13-2356-4-125-156-1
always \x67ff\x5b50 24-156-5-125-156-1
always \x6813\x585e 24-12456-3-15-2456-3
always \x6813\x5b50 24-12456-3-125-156-1
always \x6821\x52d8 13-246-5-123-1236-3
always \x6821\x5c0d 13-246-5-145-1246-5
always \x6821\x6b63 13-246-5-1-1356-5
always \x6821\x6e96 13-246-5-1-123456-4
always \x6821\x8a02 13-246-5-145-13456-5
always \x6821\x9577 15-246-5-1-1346-4
always \x6821\x95b1 13-246-5-236-5
always \x683c\x5b50 13-2346-2-125-156-1
always \x683d\x7a2e 125-2456-3-1-12346-5
always \x6843\x5b50 124-146-2-125-156-1
always \x6846\x5b50 123-456-3-125-156-1
always \x6848\x5377 1236-5-13-45-5
always \x6848\x5b50 1236-5-125-156-1
always \x684c\x5b50 1-25-3-125-156-1
always \x6876\x5b50 124-12346-4-125-156-1
always \x687f\x5b50 13-1236-4-125-156-1
always \x6885\x5b50 134-356-2-125-156-1
always \x6886\x5b50 135-1346-3-125-156-1
always \x6897\x585e 13-1356-4-15-2346-5
always \x689d\x5b50 124-246-2-125-156-1
always \x68af\x5b50 124-16-3-125-156-1
always \x68b3\x5b50 24-34-3-125-156-1
always \x68cd\x5b50 13-123456-5-125-156-1
always \x68d2\x559d 135-1346-5-1235-2346-5
always \x68d2\x5b50 135-1346-5-125-156-1
always \x68da\x5b50 1234-1356-2-125-156-1
always \x6905\x5b50 16-4-125-156-1
always \x6930\x5b50 346-2-125-156-1
always \x6954\x5b50 15-346-5-125-156-1
always \x69b4\x5f48 14-234-2-145-1236-5
always \x69d3\x5b50 13-1346-5-125-156-1
always \x6a02\x5287 236-5-13-1256-5
always \x6a02\x5668 236-5-245-16-5
always \x6a02\x5718 236-5-124-12456-2
always \x6a02\x58c7 236-5-124-1236-2
always \x6a02\x5b98 236-5-13-12456-3
always \x6a02\x5e2b 236-5-24-156-3
always \x6a02\x5e9c 236-5-12345-34-4
always \x6a02\x624b 236-5-24-12356-4
always \x6a02\x66f2 236-5-245-1256-4
always \x6a02\x6bb5 236-5-145-12456-5
always \x6a02\x6c34 246-5-24-1246-4
always \x6a02\x6d3e 236-5-1234-2456-5
always \x6a02\x7406 236-5-14-16-4
always \x6a02\x7ae0 236-5-1-1346-3
always \x6a02\x7c4d 236-5-13-16-2
always \x6a02\x8b5c 236-5-1234-34-4
always \x6a02\x8ff7 236-5-134-16-2
always \x6a02\x968a 236-5-145-1246-5
always \x6a02\x97f3 236-5-1456-3
always \x6a02\x98a8 236-5-12345-1356-3
always \x6a13\x5b50 14-12356-2-125-156-1
always \x6a21\x5b50 134-126-2-125-156-1
always \x6a21\x6a23 134-34-2-46-5
always \x6a23\x5b50 46-5-125-156-1
always \x6a58\x5b50 13-1256-2-125-156-1
always \x6a6b\x66b4 1235-1356-5-135-146-5
always \x6a6b\x6b7b 1235-1356-5-15-156-4
always \x6a6b\x798d 1235-1356-5-1235-25-5
always \x6a6b\x8089 1235-1356-5-1245-12356-5
always \x6a6b\x884c 1235-1356-5-15-13456-2
always \x6a6b\x8ca1 1235-1356-5-245-2456-2
always \x6ac3\x5b50 13-1246-5-125-156-1
always \x6adb\x6bd4 13-346-2-135-16-5
always \x6b21\x9577 245-156-5-1-1346-4
always \x6b23\x7fa1 15-1456-3-15-2345-5
always \x6b38\x4e43 2456-4-1345-2456-4
always \x6b3d\x5dee 245-1456-3-12-2456-3
always \x6b3e\x5b50 123-12456-4-125-156-1
always \x6b63\x4e2d 1-1356-5-1-12346-5
always \x6b65\x5b50 135-34-5-125-156-1
always \x6b66\x5c07 34-4-13-46-5
always \x6b6a\x66f2 2356-3-245-1256-3
always \x6b78\x9084 13-1246-3-1235-12456-2
always \x6b78\x964d 13-1246-3-15-46-2
always \x6b7b\x7576 15-156-4-145-1346-5
always \x6b7b\x96e3 15-156-4-1345-1236-5
always \x6b89\x96e3 15-256-5-1345-1236-5
always \x6b9e\x6c92 256-4-134-126-5
always \x6bba\x4f10 24-345-3-12345-345-3
always \x6bbc\x5b50 123-2346-2-125-156-1
always \x6bcf\x884c 134-356-4-1235-1346-2
always \x6bd4\x53ca 135-16-5-13-16-2
always \x6bd4\x6bd4 135-16-5-135-16-5
always \x6bd4\x80a9 135-16-5-13-2345-3
always \x6bd4\x9130 135-16-5-14-1456-2
always \x6bef\x5b50 124-1236-4-125-156-1
always \x6bfd\x5b50 13-2345-5-125-156-1
always \x6c08\x5b50 1-1236-3-125-156-1
always \x6c2b\x5f48 245-13456-3-145-1236-5
always \x6c34\x5206 24-1246-4-12345-136-5
always \x6c57\x4f4d 1235-1236-2-1246-5
always \x6c57\x570b 1235-1236-2-13-25-2
always \x6c57\x738b 1235-1236-2-456-2
always \x6c5f\x90fd 13-46-3-145-34-3
always \x6c60\x5b50 12-156-2-125-156-1
always \x6c88\x62ec 24-136-4-13-35-3
always \x6c88\x6c92 12-136-2-134-126-5
always \x6c88\x8457 12-136-2-1-25-2
always \x6c8f\x8336 245-16-5-12-345-2
always \x6c92\x4e16 134-126-5-24-156-5
always \x6c92\x5165 134-126-5-1245-34-5
always \x6c92\x6536 134-126-5-24-12356-3
always \x6c92\x6c92 134-126-5-134-126-5
always \x6c92\x843d 134-126-5-14-25-5
always \x6c92\x85e5 134-126-5-246-5
always \x6c92\x9802 134-126-5-145-13456-4
always \x6c92\x98f2 134-126-5-1456-4
always \x6c92\x9f52 134-126-5-12-156-4
always \x6c99\x5b50 24-345-3-125-156-1
always \x6cd5\x570b 12345-345-5-13-25-2
always \x6cd5\x5b50 12345-345-2-125-156-1
always \x6cd5\x76f8 12345-345-4-15-46-5
always \x6cd5\x862d 12345-345-5-14-1236-2
always \x6cd5\x8a9e 12345-345-5-1256-4
always \x6cef\x6c92 134-1456-4-134-126-5
always \x6d0b\x76f8 46-2-15-46-5
always \x6d0b\x884c 46-2-1235-1346-2
always \x6d3b\x585e 1235-25-2-15-2456-3
always \x6d77\x53c3 1235-2456-4-24-136-3
always \x6d77\x96e3 1235-2456-4-1345-1236-5
always \x6d88\x9577 15-246-3-1-1346-4
always \x6dd6\x7d04 12-25-5-236-3
always \x6de4\x585e 1256-3-15-2346-5
always \x6df1\x60e1 24-136-3-34-5
always \x6df1\x66f4 24-136-3-13-13456-3
always \x6df1\x7701 24-136-3-15-13456-4
always \x6df7\x4e82 1235-123456-4-14-12456-5
always \x6df7\x6c34 1235-123456-2-24-1246-4
always \x6df7\x6dc6 1235-123456-4-246-2
always \x6df7\x6fc1 1235-123456-2-1-25-2
